Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-15,177
Solid Waste Landfill Closure Assistance Fund; established; use; investment; council; grants; duties.

(1) There is hereby established the Solid Waste Landfill Closure Assistance Fund which shall be a cash fund administered by the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment. The fund shall be used:

(a) To provide grants for landfill site closing assessment, closure, monitoring, and remediation costs related to landfills existing or already closed on July 15, 1992; and

(b) To provide funds to the department for expenses incurred in carrying out its duties under sections 81-15,178 and 81-15,179.

Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The Environmental Quality Council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding the form and procedure for applications for grants from the fund, procedures for determining claims for payment or reimbursement, procedures for determining the amount and type of costs that are eligible for payment or reimbursement from the fund, procedures for determining priority among applicants, procedures for auditing persons who have received payments from the fund, and other provisions necessary to carry out sections 81-15,178 and 81-15,179.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 54;

Laws 1994, LB 1022, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 125;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 45;

Laws 2002, LB 1101, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 135;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 425.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.